src/fst/test/gt-desc-yamls/N-I-wâwi_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/fst/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph:  ../../../src/fst/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
  App: lookup

Tests:

  Lemma - wâwi :

      # Standard forms
      wâwi+N+I+Sg: wâwi
      wâwi+N+I+Pl: wâwa
      wâwi+N+I+Px1Sg+Sg: niwâwim
      wâwi+N+I+Px1Sg+Pl: niwâwima
      wâwi+N+I+Px1Pl+Sg: niwâwiminân
      wâwi+N+I+Px1Pl+Pl: niwâwiminâna
      wâwi+N+I+Px3Sg+Sg: owâwim
      wâwi+N+I+Px3Sg+Pl: owâwima
      wâwi+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Sg: [wâwis, wâwisîs]
      wâwi+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Pl: [wâwisa, wâwisîsa]
      wâwi+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px1Sg+Sg: [niwâwimis, niwâwimisîs]
      wâwi+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px1Sg+Pl: [niwâwimisa, niwâwimisîsa]
      wâwi+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px1Pl+Sg: [niwâwimisinân, niwâwimisîsinân]
      wâwi+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px1Pl+Pl: [niwâwimisinâna, niwâwimisîsinâna]
      # Non-standard forms
      wâwi+N+I+Px1Sg+Sg+Err/Thm: niwâwi
      wâwi+N+I+Px1Sg+Pl+Err/Thm: niwâwa
      wâwi+N+I+Px1Pl+Sg+Err/Thm: niwâwinân
      wâwi+N+I+Px1Pl+Pl+Err/Thm: niwâwinâna
      wâwi+N+I+Px3Sg+Sg+Err/Thm: owâwi
      wâwi+N+I+Px3Sg+Pl+Err/Thm: owâwa
      wâwi+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px1Sg+Sg+Err/Thm: [niwâwis, niwâwisîs, niwâwisim, niwâwisîsim, niwâwimisim, niwâwimisîsim]
      wâwi+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px1Sg+Pl+Err/Thm: [niwâwisa, niwâwisîsa, niwâwisima, niwâwisîsima, niwâwimisima, niwâwimisîsima]
      wâwi+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px1Pl+Sg+Err/Thm: [niwâwisinân, niwâwisiminân, niwâwimisiminân]
      wâwi+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px1Pl+Pl+Err/Thm: [niwâwisinâna, niwâwisiminâna, niwâwimisiminâna]
